Illinois, session 104th, HB3439.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Sections 4.1 and 7.10 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/4.1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2214.1)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)8    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations. The 9Department shall require that each child care facility license 10applicant as part of the application process, and each 11employee and volunteer of a child care facility or 12non-licensed service provider, as a condition of employment, 13authorize an investigation to determine if such applicant, 14employee, or volunteer has ever been charged with a crime and 15if so, the disposition of those charges; this authorization 16shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the agencies which 17may be contacted. An employee or volunteer of a day care 18center, day care home, or group day care home shall authorize 19an investigation every 5 years, as required under the Child 20Care and Development Block Grant. Upon this authorization, the 21Director shall request and receive information and assistance 22from any federal, State or local governmental agency as part 23of the authorized investigation. Each applicant, employee, or   HB3439 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 2provider shall submit the applicant's, employee's, or 3volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in the 4form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 5fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint records 6now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police and 7Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 8databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for 9conducting the criminal history records check, which shall be 10deposited in the State Police Services Fund and shall not 11exceed the actual cost of the records check. The Illinois 12State Police shall provide information concerning any criminal 13charges, and their disposition, now or hereafter filed, 14against an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care 15facility or non-licensed service provider upon request of the 16Department of Children and Family Services when the request is 17made in the form and manner required by the Illinois State 18Police.19    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 20employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 21non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 22including the source of the information and any conclusions or 23recommendations derived from the information, shall be 24provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 25volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 26provider prior to final action by the Department on the   HB3439 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1application. State conviction information provided by the 2Illinois State Police regarding employees, prospective 3employees, or volunteers of non-licensed service providers and 4child care facilities licensed under this Act shall be 5provided to the operator of such facility, and, upon request, 6to the employee, prospective employee, or volunteer of a child 7care facility or non-licensed service provider. Any 8information concerning criminal charges and the disposition of 9such charges obtained by the Department shall be confidential 10and may not be transmitted outside the Department, except as 11required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone within 12the Department except as needed for the purpose of evaluating 13an application or an employee or volunteer of a child care 14facility or non-licensed service provider. Only information 15and standards which bear a reasonable and rational relation to 16the performance of a child care facility shall be used by the 17Department or any licensee. Any employee of the Department of 18Children and Family Services, Illinois State Police, or a 19child care facility receiving confidential information under 20this Section who gives or causes to be given any confidential 21information concerning any criminal convictions of an 22applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 23non-licensed service provider, shall be guilty of a Class A 24misdemeanor unless release of such information is authorized 25by this Section.26    The Department of Children and Family Services, through   HB3439 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1June 30, 2026, or the Department of Early Childhood, on and 2after July 1, 2026, shall allow day care centers, day care 3homes, and group day care homes to A child care facility may 4hire, on a probationary basis, any employee or volunteer of a 5child care facility or non-licensed service provider 6authorizing a criminal background investigation under this 7Section after receiving a qualifying result, as determined by 8the Department of Children and Family Services or the 9Department of Early Childhood, whichever is applicable, 10pursuant to this Act, from either: , pending the result of such 11investigation. 12        (1) the Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint 13    criminal background check; or14        (2) the Illinois State Police fingerprint criminal 15    background check and a criminal record check of the 16    criminal repository of each state in which the employee or 17    volunteer resided during the preceding 5 years.18    Pending full clearance of all background check 19requirements, the prospective employee or volunteer must be 20supervised at all times by an individual who received a 21qualifying result on all background check components. 22Employees and volunteers of a day care center, day care home, 23or group day care home child care facility or non-licensed 24service provider shall be notified prior to hiring that such 25employment may be terminated on the basis of criminal 26background information obtained by the facility.  HB3439 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.) 2    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)3    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations. The 4Department of Children and Family Services or the Department 5of Early Childhood shall require that each child care facility 6license applicant under the agencies' respective authority as 7part of the application process, and each employee and 8volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 9provider, as a condition of employment, authorize an 10investigation to determine if such applicant, employee, or 11volunteer has ever been charged with a crime and if so, the 12disposition of those charges; this authorization shall 13indicate the scope of the inquiry and the agencies which may be 14contacted. An employee or volunteer of a day care center, day 15care home, or group day care home shall authorize an 16investigation every 5 years, as required under the Child Care 17and Development Block Grant. Upon this authorization, the 18Director shall request and receive information and assistance 19from any federal, State or local governmental agency as part 20of the authorized investigation. Each applicant, employee, or 21volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 22provider shall submit the applicant's, employee's, or 23volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in the 24form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 25fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint records   HB3439 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police and 2Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 3databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for 4conducting the criminal history records check, which shall be 5deposited in the State Police Services Fund and shall not 6exceed the actual cost of the records check. The Illinois 7State Police shall provide information concerning any criminal 8charges, and their disposition, now or hereafter filed, 9against an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care 10facility or non-licensed service provider upon request of the 11Department of Children and Family Services or the Department 12of Early Childhood when the request is made in the form and 13manner required by the Illinois State Police.14    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 15employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 16non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 17including the source of the information and any conclusions or 18recommendations derived from the information, shall be 19provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 20volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 21provider prior to final action by the Department of Children 22and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood under 23the agencies' respective authority on the application. State 24conviction information provided by the Illinois State Police 25regarding employees, prospective employees, or volunteers of 26non-licensed service providers and child care facilities   HB3439 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1licensed under this Act shall be provided to the operator of 2such facility, and, upon request, to the employee, prospective 3employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 4non-licensed service provider. Any information concerning 5criminal charges and the disposition of such charges obtained 6by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 7Department of Early Childhood shall be confidential and may 8not be transmitted outside the Department of Children and 9Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, except 10as required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone 11within the Department of Children and Family Services or the 12Department of Early Childhood except as needed for the purpose 13of evaluating an application or an employee or volunteer of a 14child care facility or non-licensed service provider. Only 15information and standards which bear a reasonable and rational 16relation to the performance of a child care facility shall be 17used by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 18Department of Early Childhood or any licensee. Any employee of 19the Department of Children and Family Services, Department of 20Early Childhood, Illinois State Police, or a child care 21facility receiving confidential information under this Section 22who gives or causes to be given any confidential information 23concerning any criminal convictions of an applicant, employee, 24or volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 25provider, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless 26release of such information is authorized by this Section.  HB3439 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1    The Department of Children and Family Services, through 2June 30, 2026, or the Department of Early Childhood, on and 3after July 1, 2026, shall allow day care centers, day care 4homes, and group day care homes to A child care facility may 5hire, on a probationary basis, any employee or volunteer of a 6child care facility or non-licensed service provider 7authorizing a criminal background investigation under this 8Section after receiving a qualifying result, as determined by 9the Department of Children and Family Services or the 10Department of Early Childhood, whichever is applicable, 11pursuant to this Act, from either: , pending the result of such 12investigation. 13        (1) the Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint 14    criminal background check; or15        (2) the Illinois State Police fingerprint criminal 16    background check and a criminal record check of the 17    criminal repository of each state in which the employee or 18    volunteer resided during the preceding 5 years.19    Pending full clearance of all background check 20requirements, the prospective employee or volunteer must be 21supervised at all times by an individual who received a 22qualifying result on all background check components. 23Employees and volunteers of a day care center, day care home, 24or group day care home child care facility or non-licensed 25service provider shall be notified prior to hiring that such 26employment may be terminated on the basis of criminal   HB3439 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1background information obtained by the facility.2(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 3103-594, eff. 7-1-26.) 4    (225 ILCS 10/7.10)5    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)6    Sec. 7.10. Licensing orientation program and progress 7report. 8    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "child day care 9licensing" or "day care licensing" means licensing of day care 10centers, day care homes, and group day care homes. 11    (a-5) In addition to current day care daycare training and 12subject to appropriations, the Department or any State agency 13that assumes day care center licensing responsibilities shall 14host licensing orientation programs to help educate potential 15day care center, day care home, and group day care home 16providers about the child day care licensing process. The 17programs shall be made available in person and virtually. The 18Department or its successor shall offer to host licensing 19orientation programs at least twice annually in each 20Representative District in the State. Additionally, if one or 21more persons request that a program be offered in a language 22other than English, then the Department or its successor must 23accommodate the request. 24    (b) No later than September 30th of each year, the 25Department shall provide the General Assembly with a   HB3439 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1comprehensive report on its progress in meeting performance 2measures and goals related to child day care licensing.3    (c) The report shall include:4        (1) details on the funding for child day care 5    licensing, including:6            (A) the total number of full-time employees 7        working on child day care licensing;8            (B) the names of all sources of revenue used to 9        support child day care licensing;10            (C) the amount of expenditures that is claimed 11        against federal funding sources;12            (D) the identity of federal funding sources; and13            (E) how funds are appropriated, including 14        appropriations for line staff, support staff, 15        supervisory staff, and training and other expenses and 16        the funding history of such licensing since fiscal 17        year 2010;18        (2) current staffing qualifications of day care 19    licensing representatives and day care licensing 20    supervisors in comparison with staffing qualifications 21    specified in the job description;22        (3) data history for fiscal year 2010 to the current 23    fiscal year on day care licensing representative caseloads 24    and staffing levels in all areas of the State;25        (4) per the DCFS Child Day Care Licensing Advisory 26    Council's work plan, quarterly data on the following   HB3439 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1    measures:2            (A) the number and percentage of new applications 3        disposed of within 90 days;4            (B) the percentage of licenses renewed on time;5            (C) the percentage of day care centers receiving 6        timely annual monitoring visits;7            (D) the percentage of day care homes receiving 8        timely annual monitoring visits;9            (E) the percentage of group day care homes 10        receiving timely annual monitoring visits;11            (F) the percentage of provider requests for 12        supervisory review; 13            (G) the progress on adopting a key indicator 14        system;15            (H) the percentage of complaints disposed of 16        within 30 days;17            (I) the average number of days a day care center 18        applicant must wait to attend a licensing orientation;19            (J) the number of licensing orientation sessions 20        available per region in the past year; and21            (K) the number of Department trainings related to 22        licensing and child development available to providers 23        in the past year; and24        (5) efforts to coordinate with the Department of Human 25    Services and the State Board of Education on professional 26    development, credentialing issues, and child developers,   HB3439 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1    including training registry, child developers, and Quality 2    Rating and Improvement Systems (QRIS).3    (d) The Department shall work with the Governor's 4appointed Early Learning Council on issues related to and 5concerning child day care.6(Source: P.A. 103-805, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-10-24.) 7    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)8    Sec. 7.10. Licensing orientation program and progress 9report. 10    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "child day care 11licensing" or "day care licensing" means licensing of day care 12centers, day care homes, and group day care homes. 13    (a-5) In addition to current day care daycare training and 14subject to appropriations, the Department or any State agency 15that assumes day care center licensing responsibilities shall 16host licensing orientation programs to help educate potential 17day care center, day care home, and group day care home 18providers about the child day care licensing process. The 19programs shall be made available in person and virtually. The 20Department or its successor shall offer to host licensing 21orientation programs at least twice annually in each 22Representative District in the State. Additionally, if one or 23more persons request that a program be offered in a language 24other than English, then the Department or its successor must 25accommodate the request.   HB3439 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1    (b) No later than September 30th of each year, the 2Department of Early Childhood shall provide the General 3Assembly with a comprehensive report on its progress in 4meeting performance measures and goals related to child day 5care licensing.6    (c) The report shall include:7        (1) details on the funding for child day care 8    licensing, including:9            (A) the total number of full-time employees 10        working on child day care licensing;11            (B) the names of all sources of revenue used to 12        support child day care licensing;13            (C) the amount of expenditures that is claimed 14        against federal funding sources;15            (D) the identity of federal funding sources; and16            (E) how funds are appropriated, including 17        appropriations for line staff, support staff, 18        supervisory staff, and training and other expenses and 19        the funding history of such licensing since fiscal 20        year 2010;21        (2) current staffing qualifications of day care 22    licensing representatives and day care licensing 23    supervisors in comparison with staffing qualifications 24    specified in the job description;25        (3) data history for fiscal year 2010 to the current 26    fiscal year on day care licensing representative caseloads   HB3439 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1    and staffing levels in all areas of the State;2        (4) per the DCFS Child Day Care Licensing Advisory 3    Council's work plan, quarterly data on the following 4    measures:5            (A) the number and percentage of new applications 6        disposed of within 90 days;7            (B) the percentage of licenses renewed on time;8            (C) the percentage of day care centers receiving 9        timely annual monitoring visits;10            (D) the percentage of day care homes receiving 11        timely annual monitoring visits;12            (E) the percentage of group day care homes 13        receiving timely annual monitoring visits;14            (F) the percentage of provider requests for 15        supervisory review; 16            (G) the progress on adopting a key indicator 17        system;18            (H) the percentage of complaints disposed of 19        within 30 days;20            (I) the average number of days a day care center 21        applicant must wait to attend a licensing orientation;22            (J) the number of licensing orientation sessions 23        available per region in the past year; and24            (K) the number of Department of Early Childhood 25        trainings related to licensing and child development 26        available to providers in the past year; and  HB3439 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08884 AAS 18939 b1        (5) efforts to coordinate with the Department of Human 2    Services and the State Board of Education on professional 3    development, credentialing issues, and child developers, 4    including training registry, child developers, and Quality 5    Rating and Improvement Systems (QRIS).6    (d) The Department of Early Childhood shall work with the 7Governor's appointed Early Learning Council on issues related 8to and concerning child day care.9(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 7-1-26; 103-805, eff. 1-1-25; 10revised 11-26-24.) 11    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 12changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 13that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 14represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 15not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 16made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 17Public Act.